Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Part 4 Registration Enforcement and Modification of Foreign Child-Support Order

15-23.1-615.
Jurisdiction to modify child-support order of foreign country.

Except as otherwise provided in §

15-23.1-711

, if a foreign country lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child-support order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of this state may assume jurisdiction to modify the child-support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether the consent to modification of a child-support order otherwise required of the individual pursuant to §

15-23.1-611

has been given or whether the individual seeking modification is a resident of this state or of the foreign country.

An order issued by a tribunal of this state modifying a foreign child-support order pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 69, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 76, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 1.

15-23.1-616.
Procedure to register child-support order of foreign country for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a foreign child-support order not under the convention may register that order in this state under §§

15-23.1-601

—

15-23.1-608

if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or at another time. The petition must specify the grounds for modification.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 3.